Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2442
Issuing public corporation, defined.

Issuing public corporation shall mean:

(1) A domestic corporation (a) which has one hundred or more shareholders and (b) which has (i) its principal executive offices within Nebraska, (ii) assets in Nebraska with a market value of at least ten million dollars, or (iii) ten percent or more of its shareholders resident in Nebraska or ten percent or more of its shares owned by Nebraska residents. For purposes of section 21-2453 only, the determination described in this subdivision shall be made as of the share acquisition date in question. The residence of a shareholder shall be presumed to be the address appearing on the records of the corporation; or

(2) A foreign corporation which has (a) one hundred or more shareholders, (b) its principal executive offices within Nebraska, (c) assets in Nebraska with a market value of at least ten million dollars, (d) ten percent or more of its shareholders resident in Nebraska or ten percent or more of its shares owned by Nebraska residents, and (e) at least five hundred employees in Nebraska. For purposes of section 21-2453 only, the determination described in this subdivision shall be made as of the share acquisition date in question. The residence of a shareholder shall be presumed to be the address appearing on the records of the corporation.

Laws 1988, LB 1110, § 12.